Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UPPER MISSISSIPPI RIVER BASIN PRIORITY LAKES AND STREAMS INITIATIVE.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the ..... fund to the commissioner of natural resources to establish and operate an upper Mississippi River basin priority lakes and streams initiative to protect water quality in high-quality lakes and streams in the upper Mississippi River basin by protecting, preserving, and enhancing forests in the basin under the Minnesota forests for the future program according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.66, through other existing programs, and through coordinated requests for additional funding from available sources. The commissioner may transfer a portion of this appropriation to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire conservation easements as part of the initiative. Money transferred to the Board of Water and Soil Resources may be deposited in the water and soil conservation easement stewardship account under Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.103. new text end